Hawaii statutes.
§142-73 Jurisdiction; appeal. The
judge shall upon receiving the amount claimed, including pound fees, if any, or
a good and sufficient bond for the amount, and the costs of the action, issue
the required certificate, and at the same time summon the parties to appear
before the judge with their witnesses; and after a fair hearing the judge shall
decide between them. No appeal shall be allowed from the judge's decision
unless taken and perfected within five days after the decision has been
rendered. In case of appeal the judge shall send up the costs deposited, and
the amount claimed or the bond given in lieu of the amount, to the appellate
court together with the certificate of appeal. If it appears on trial that the
impounding was illegal, the landowner shall be compelled to pay the pound fees.
[L 1907, c 125, §21; RL 1925, §709; RL 1935, §287; RL 1945, §1093; RL 1955,
§20-72; HRS §142-73; am L 1970, c 188, §39]

Case Notes

Party who impounds
has burden of showing the right to impound. 21 H. 532.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next